Tennessee, session 114, SB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-1-707, is amended by deleting
"On or after January 1, 2012, in addition" and substituting "In addition".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1062
002174
- 1 -